Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1305
Road record; duty to keep.

It shall be the duty of the county clerk to record in a proper book, to be called the Road Record, a record of the proceedings in regard to laying out and establishing, changing or discontinuing roads in the county.

Laws 1879, § 77, p. 375;

R.S.1913, § 5609;

C.S.1922, § 4928;

C.S.1929, § 26-1005;

R.S.1943, § 23-1305.